csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_i.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg: niimiyaan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg: niimiyan 
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl: niimiyaang
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl: niimiyang
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl: niimiyeg
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: niimid
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: niimiwaad
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: niiminid
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: niiminid
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X: niiming
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg: niimisiwaan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg: niimisiwan 
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl: niimisiwaang
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl: niimisiwang
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl: niimisiweg
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: niimisig
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: niimisigwaa
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: niimisinig
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: niimisinig
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X: niimising
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg: niimiyaambaan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg: niimiyamban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl: niimiyaangiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl: niimiyangiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl: niimiyegiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: niimipan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: niimiwaapan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: niiminipan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: niiminipan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X: niimingiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg: niimisiwaambaan
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg: niimisiwamban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl: niimisiwaangiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl: niimisiwangiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl: niimisiwegiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: niimisigoban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: niimisigwaaban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: niimisinigoban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: niimisinigoban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X: niimisingiban
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg: niimiwaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg: niimiwanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl: niimiwaangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl: niimiwangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl: niimiwegwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: niimigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: niimiwaagwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: niiminigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: niiminigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X: niimiwiingen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg: niimisiiwaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg: niimisiiwanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl: niimisiiwaangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl: niimisiiwangen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl: niimisiiwegwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: niimisiigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: niimisiiwaagwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: niimisiinigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: niimisiinigwen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X: niimisiiwiingen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+1Sg: niimiwaambaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Sg: niimiwambanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Excl: niimiwaangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+Incl: niimiwangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+2Pl: niimiwegibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: niimigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: niimiwaagobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: niiminigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: niiminigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+X: niimiwiingibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+1Sg: niimisiiwaambaanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Sg: niimisiiwambanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Excl: niimisiiwaangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+Incl: niimisiiwangibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+2Pl: niimisiiwegibanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: niimisiigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: niimisiiwaagobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: niimisiinigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlObv: niimisiinigobanen
     niimi+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+X: niimisiiwiingibanen
